Washington statutes.
RCW 27.34.370

Women's history consortium—Responsibilities of board of advisors.

Key responsibilities of the board of advisors include:

(1) Organizational and fiscal planning, management, and oversight;

(2) Adopting criteria and procedures for consortium membership and member responsibilities;

(3) Identifying short-term and long-term priorities of the consortium, with special emphasis on short-term priorities relating to preserving historical information from the last several decades before it is lost;

(4) Appointing special committees and task forces including people from consortium members and nonmembers to assist with the consortium's tasks; and

(5) Developing recommendations for statewide commemoration of the centennial of the adoption in 1910 of the fifth amendment to the Washington state Constitution, guaranteeing women's suffrage.

[ 2005 c 391 s 4.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2005 c 391: See note following RCW 27.34.360.